Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 2 Department of Community Health
31-2-8.
Actions against certain applicants or licensees.

This Code section shall be applicable to any agency, center, facility, institution, community living arrangement, drug abuse treatment and education program, or entity subject to regulation by the department under Chapters 7, 13, 22, 23, and 44 of this title; Chapter 5 of Title 26; paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4; and Article 7 of Chapter 6 of Title 49. For purposes of this Code section, the term “license” shall be used to refer to any license, permit, registration, or commission issued by the department pursuant to the provisions of the law cited in this subsection.

The department shall have the authority to take any of the actions enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section upon a finding that the applicant or licensee has:

Knowingly made any false statement of material information in connection with the application for a license, or in statements made or on documents submitted to the department as part of an inspection, survey, or investigation, or in the alteration or falsification of records maintained by the agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Failed or refused to provide the department with access to the premises subject to regulation or information pertinent to the initial or continued licensing of the agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Failed to comply with the licensing requirements of this state; or

Failed to comply with any provision of this Code section.

When the department finds that any applicant or licensee has violated any provision of subsection (b) of this Code section or laws, rules, regulations, or formal orders related to the initial or continued licensing of the agency, facility, institution, or entity, the department, subject to notice and opportunity for hearing, may take any of the following actions:

Refuse to grant a license; provided, however, that the department may refuse to grant a license without holding a hearing prior to taking such action;

Administer a public reprimand;

Suspend any license for a definite period or for an indefinite period in connection with any condition which may be attached to the restoration of said license;

Prohibit any applicant or licensee from allowing a person who previously was involved in the management or control, as defined by rule, of any agency, facility, institution, or entity which has had its license or application revoked or denied within the past 12 months to be involved in the management or control of such agency, facility, institution, or entity;

Revoke any license;

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, impose a fine of up to $2,000.00 per day for each violation of a law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or ongoing licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity, up to a total of $40,000.00;

Impose a mandatory fine of no less than $5,000.00 for a violation of a law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or ongoing licensing of a long-term care facility which has caused the death of or serious physical harm to a resident in such facility. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term “serious physical harm” means an injury which causes any significant impairment of the physical condition of the resident as determined by qualified medical personnel;

No fine may be imposed pursuant to this paragraph against any nursing facility, nursing home, or intermediate care facility which is subject to intermediate sanctions under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r(h)(2)(A), as amended, whether or not those sanctions are actually imposed; or

Limit or restrict any license as the department deems necessary for the protection of the public, including, but not limited to, restricting some or all services of or admissions into an agency, facility, institution, or entity for a time certain.

In taking any of the actions enumerated in this subsection, the department shall consider the seriousness of the violation, including the circumstances, extent, and gravity of the prohibited acts, and the hazard or potential hazard created to the health or safety of the public.

With respect to any facility classified as a nursing facility, nursing home, or intermediate care home, the department may not take an action to fine or restrict the license of any such facility based on the same act, occurrence, or omission for which:

The facility has received an intermediate sanction under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r(h)(2)(A), as amended, or 42 U.S.C. Section 1395i-3(h)(2)(B); or

Such facility has been served formal notice of intent to take such a sanction which the department based on administrative review or any other appropriate body based on administrative or judicial review determines not to impose; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the department from utilizing the provisions authorized under subsection (f) of this Code section.

When any civil monetary penalty is recommended and imposed against such facility, and the department does not resurvey the facility within 48 hours after the date by which all items on a plan of correction submitted by the facility are to be completed, the accrual of any resulting civil monetary penalties shall be suspended until the facility is resurveyed by the department.

If the department resurveys such facility beyond 48 hours after the final date for completion of all items on the plan of correction submitted by the facility, and the facility is not in substantial compliance with the applicable standards, any civil monetary penalties imposed shall relate back to the date on which such penalties were suspended.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, nothing contained in said paragraphs shall be construed as requiring the state survey agency to act in violation of applicable federal law, regulations, and guidelines.

The department may deny a license or otherwise restrict a license for any applicant who has had a license denied, revoked, or suspended within one year of the date of an application or who has transferred ownership or governing authority of an agency, facility, institution, or entity subject to regulation by the department within one year of the date of a new application when such transfer was made in order to avert denial, revocation, or suspension of a license or to avert the payment of fines assessed by the department pursuant to this Code section.

With regard to any contested case instituted by the department pursuant to this Code section or other provisions of law which may now or hereafter authorize remedial or disciplinary grounds and action, the department may, in its discretion, dispose of the action so instituted by settlement. In such cases, all parties, successors, and assigns to any settlement agreement shall be bound by the terms specified therein, and violation thereof by any applicant or licensee shall constitute grounds for any action enumerated in subsection (c) of this Code section.

The department shall have the authority to make public or private investigations or examinations inside or outside of this state to determine whether the provisions of this Code section or any other law, rule, regulation, or formal order relating to the licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity has been violated. Such investigations may be initiated at any time, in the discretion of the department, and may continue during the pendency of any action initiated by the department pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

For the purpose of conducting any investigation, inspection, or survey, the department shall have the authority to require the production of any books, records, papers, or other information related to the initial or continued licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity.

Pursuant to the investigation, inspection, and enforcement powers given to the department by this Code section and other applicable laws, the department may assess against an agency, facility, institution, or entity reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by the department pursuant to any administrative or legal action required by the failure of the agency, facility, institution, or entity to fully comply with the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or continued licensing. Assessments shall not include attorney’s fees and expenses of litigation, shall not exceed other actual expenses, and shall only be assessed if such investigations, inspection, or enforcement actions result in adverse findings, as finally determined by the department, pursuant to administrative or legal action.

For any action taken or any proceeding held under this Code section or under color of law, except for gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct, the department, when acting in its official capacity, shall be immune from liability and suit to the same extent that any judge of any court of general jurisdiction in this state would be immune.

In an administrative or legal proceeding under this Code section, a person or entity claiming an exemption or an exception granted by law, rule, regulation, or formal order has the burden of proving this exemption or exception.

This Code section and all actions resulting from its provisions shall be administered in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The provisions of this Code section shall be supplemental to and shall not operate to prohibit the department from acting pursuant to those provisions of law which may now or hereafter authorize remedial or disciplinary grounds and action for the department. In cases where those other provisions of law so authorize other disciplinary grounds and actions, but this Code section limits such grounds or actions, those other provisions shall apply.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 341, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1290, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2000, p. 526, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1230, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 558, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-2-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2-8

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 3/HB 987; Ga. L. 2021, p. 922, § 31/HB 497.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, rewrote paragraph (c)(6), which read: “Impose a fine, not to exceed a total of $25,000.00, of up to $1,000.00 per day for each violation of a law, rule, regulation, or formal order related to the initial or ongoing licensing of any agency, facility, institution, or entity, except that no fine may be imposed against any nursing facility, nursing home, or intermediate care facility which is subject to intermediate sanctions under the provisions of 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r(h)(2)(A), as amended, whether or not those sanctions are actually imposed; or”; and added “or to avert the payment of fines assessed by the department pursuant to this Code section” at the end of subsection (e).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 10, 2021, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, in subparagraph (c)(6)(B), substituted “of a long-term care facility” for “of long-term care facility” in the middle of the first sentence, and revised punctuation in the second sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “ 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r(h)(2)(A)” was substituted for “ 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r(h)(2)(a)” in paragraph (c)(6).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “44” was substituted for “43” in subsection (a).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, the substitution of “23, and 44” for “and 23” was retained in subsection (a) due to the elimination of the repeal of T. 31, Ch. 44, in accordance with Ga. L. 2005, p. 1194, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 298, § 3(b), not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the first 2003 amendment became effective July 1 of the fiscal year following the year in which funds are specifically appropriated for the purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act making specific reference to this Act and shall become effective when funds so appropriated become available for expenditure. Funds were appropriated at the 2007 session of the General Assembly, and thus the first 2003 amendment became effective July 1, 2008.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 1194, § 1/SB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(b) The following provision of law is repealed:

Section 4 of an Act amending Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to health, approved April 20, 2000 (Ga. L. 2000, p. 526), which now repealed section would have provided for a future repeal or sunset of certain provisions relating to renal dialysis facilities.” This 2005 law effectively repeals the automatic repeal provision of Ga. L. 2000, p. 526.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-8 as present Code Section 31-2A-9.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 158 (2001).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2-9.
[Repealed] Records check requirement for certain health care facilities; definitions; use of information gathered in investigation; penalties for unauthorized release or disclosure; rules and regulations; retention of fingerprints.

History.

Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 31/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 10/SB 178; Code 1981, §

31-2-9

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 351, § 2/HB 1110; Ga. L. 2013, p. 524, § 3-2/HB 78; Ga. L. 2014, p. 444, § 2-8/HB 271; Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-8/HB 72; Ga. L. 2018, p. 507, § 2-6/SB 336; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 611, § 1-1/SB 406, effective October 1, 2019.

31-2-10.
Information and comparisons regarding state-wide cost and quality of health care.

Performance and outcome data and pricing data for selected medical conditions, surgeries, and procedures in hospitals, ambulatory surgery centers, nursing homes, and rehabilitation centers in Georgia shall be reported to the Department of Community Health on a regular basis. The department shall provide for the establishment of a website for the purpose of providing consumers information on the cost and quality of health care in Georgia to include but not be limited to cost comparison information on certain prescription drugs at different pharmacies in Georgia, hospitals, ambulatory surgery centers, nursing homes, and rehabilitation centers and facilities in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 19/HB 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 324, § 31/SB 455; Code 1981, §

31-2-15

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2-10

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 3-2/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-10 as present Code Section 31-2A-10.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

For article, “Health: Department of Public Health,” see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2-11.
Biopharmaceuticals; expedited review for Georgia based companies.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Biopharmaceutical” means the application of biotechnology to the development of pharmaceutical products that improve human health.

“Biotechnology” means any technological application that uses biological systems, living organisms, or derivatives thereof to make or modify products or processes for specific use.

“Georgia biotechnology, biopharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical company” means a biotechnology, biopharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical company, or a corporate division of such a company:

The principal activity of which is research or development, manufacturing, or sales of health care products in this state; and

That had a total economic impact in this state of not less than $60 million during the most recent taxable year;

That has total capital investment in this state of not less than $100 million; and

That employs at least 200 Georgia residents.

Such term shall not mean a warehouse used to store health care products.

“Pharmaceutical” means of or pertaining to the knowledge or art of pharmacy or to the art of preparing medicines according to the rules or formulas of pharmacy.

“Research and development” means experimental or laboratory activity for the ultimate purpose of developing new products, improving existing products, developing new uses for existing products, or developing or improving methods for producing products.

“Total economic impact” means the sum of total employee payroll, investment in external research and development, the value of prescription drug samples provided to physicians, and the value of prescription drugs donated to low-income individuals through patient assistance programs.

The Department of Community Health shall expedite the review of any prescription drug or other health care product having an approved indication from the federal Food and Drug Administration for use with humans and that is produced by a Georgia biotechnology, biopharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical company for any health care coverage provided under the state health benefit plan under Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45, the medical assistance program under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the PeachCare for Kids Program under Article 13 of Chapter 5 of Title 49, or any other health benefit plan or policy administered by or on behalf of the state. Such review shall take place as soon as practicable following the date that such drug or health care product becomes available for public consumption. This subsection shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed by the Department of Community Health on or after July 1, 2008.

In complying with the provisions of this Code section, the department shall consider the nexus of a biotechnology, biopharmaceutical, or pharmaceutical company in relation to the state along with the financial impact on the state, the quality of the product, and other relevant factors.

History.

Code 1981, § 31-5A-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 121, § 1/HB 180; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB46; Code 1981, §

31-2-16

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-1/HB 228; Code 1981, §

31-2-11

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 31/HB 942.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-11 as present Code Section 31-2-8.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-2-12.
[Reserved] Pilot program to provide coverage for bariatric surgical procedures for treatment of obesity and related conditions; definitions; eligibility; requirements; evaluation report on two-year pilot program.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2014, p. 172, § 1/HB 511, effective December 31, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

31-2-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 172, § 1/HB 511.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31(3)/SB 52, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, designated this Code section as reserved.

31-2-13.
Inspection warrant.

As used in this Code section, the term “commissioner” means the commissioner of community health or his or her designee.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to require an inspection warrant when a warrantless inspection is authorized by law or pursuant to a rule or regulation enacted pursuant to this title.

An inspection warrant is an order, in writing, signed by a judicial officer, directed to the commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections for such commissioner and commanding him or her to conduct an inspection required or authorized by:

This title;

Any other law administered by the commissioner;

Rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this title; or

Rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to any other law administered by the commissioner.

The commissioner or any person authorized to make inspections for such commissioner shall make application for an inspection warrant to a person who is a judicial officer within the meaning of Code Section 17-5-21.

An inspection warrant shall be issued only upon cause and when supported by an affidavit which:

Particularly describes the place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle to be inspected;

Particularly describes the purpose for which the inspection is to be made; and

Contains either a statement that consent to inspect has been sought and refused or facts or circumstances reasonably justifying the failure to seek such consent.

Cause to support the issuance of an inspection warrant shall be deemed to exist if:

Reasonable legislative or administrative standards for conducting a routine or area inspection are satisfied with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle; or

There is reason to believe that a condition of nonconformity exists with respect to the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle.

An inspection warrant shall be effective for the time specified therein, but not for a period of more than 14 days, unless extended or renewed by the judicial officer who signed and issued the original warrant, upon satisfaction that such extension or renewal is in the public interest. Such inspection warrant shall be executed and returned to the judicial officer by whom it was issued within the time specified in such warrant or within the extended or renewed time. After the expiration of such time, the inspection warrant, unless executed, shall be void.

An inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant:

May be executed at any time as deemed appropriate by the individual executing such warrant but whenever possible shall be made at any time during operating or regular business hours;

Should not be performed in the absence of an owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle being inspected unless specifically authorized by the judicial officer upon a showing that such authority is reasonably necessary to effectuate the purpose of the law, rule, or regulation being enforced; and

Shall not be made by means of forcible entry, except that the judicial officer may expressly authorize a forcible entry when facts are shown:

Which are sufficient to create a reasonable suspicion of a violation of this title or any other law, rule, or regulation administered by the commissioner or the department, which, if such violation existed, would be an immediate threat to health or safety; or

Establishing that a reasonable attempt to serve a previous inspection warrant has been unsuccessful.

When prior consent for an inspection has been sought and refused and an investigation warrant has been issued, an inspection warrant may be executed without further notice to the owner or occupant of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle being inspected.

It shall be unlawful for any owner, operator, or employee of the particular place, dwelling, structure, premises, or vehicle being inspected to refuse to allow an inspection pursuant to an inspection warrant issued as provided in this Code section. Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 598, § 1-9/HB 72.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 enactment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 63 (2015).

31-2-14.
Nurse aide registry; complaint filing; public access.

The nurse aide registry established and maintained by the department as required by 42 C.F.R. Section 483.156 shall include, in addition to nurse aides who work in licensed facilities, nurse aides who provide services in this state in temporary or permanent private residences.

The registry shall provide a method for an inquiry or complaint to be submitted by the public regarding a nurse aide providing services in private residences. Any such inquiries or complaints shall be handled in the same manner as required for nurse aides who work in licensed facilities.

The department shall ensure that the registry is posted or a link to it is provided in a prominent location on the department’s website.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 201, § 1/HB 1037.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-14 as present Code Section 31-2-9.

31-2-15.
Streamlining and expediting credentialing and billing processes.

As used in this Code section, the term “state medical plan” means the state health benefit plan under Article 1 of Chapter 18 of Title 45, the medical assistance program under Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49, the PeachCare for Kids Program under Article 13 of Chapter 5 of Title 49, and any other health benefit plan or policy administered by or on behalf of the state.

The department shall take all reasonable steps to streamline and expedite the credentialing and billing processes for state medical plans, including but not limited to examining the potential for a uniform billing platform or portal; examining the potential for the standardization of billing codes among providers; posting billing criteria and codes on the department’s website; enabling a dual track process for credentialing and contract negotiation for new providers; allowing billing for telehealth delivered care and allowing payment for both the on-site provider and off-site provider; and maximizing billing for multiple specialists and multiple encounters with one provider at a single visit in safety net settings, critical access settings, federally qualified health centers, and general practitioner settings.

This Code section shall not be construed to require the department to act in violation of any federal law, rule, or regulation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 3B/HB 769.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-15 as present Code Section 31-2-10.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 8(c)/HB 769, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(c)(1) Section 3A of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2018, only if SB 357 or another Act creating the Health Coordination and Innovation Council is enacted by the General Assembly and becomes law in 2018, in which event Section 3B of this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2018.

“(2) If SB 357 or another Act creating the Health Coordination and Innovation Council does not become law in 2018, then Section 3B of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2018, and Section 3A of this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2018.” SB 357 was passed by the General Assembly but was vetoed by the Governor on May 8, 2018, and did not become law.

31-2-16.
Rural Health System Innovation Center created; purposes and duties; reporting.

There is created and established the Rural Health System Innovation Center within the department’s State Office of Rural Health to serve as a research organization that utilizes Georgia’s academic, public health policy, data, and workforce resources to develop new approaches for financing and delivering health care in this state. The department shall release a request for proposals, no later than December 1, 2018, to identify a postsecondary institution within the state in which the center shall be located. Such postsecondary institution shall have a health program or college that focuses on rural and underserved areas of the state. The department shall reissue a request for proposal after seven years and every five years thereafter.

The purposes and duties of the Rural Health System Innovation Center shall be to:

Develop a research program to identify and analyze significant health system problems and to propose solutions and best practices to such problems;

Focus on access improvement to affordable health care in rural Georgia;

Synthesize existing studies, reports, and data to provide a baseline assessment and set measurable goals as part of Georgia’s strategic reform plan;

Incorporate recommendations from state reform efforts to build the state’s reform plan;

Evaluate and make recommendations for the fiscal stabilization of rural health care delivery systems and ensure their design is appropriate for the community served by such systems;

Provide technical assistance and expertise to address immediate needs of rural communities;

Develop state-wide pilot projects, identify innovative approaches to funding these projects, and track and evaluate the projects’ performance;

Connect to a central health data repository for collection and dissemination of health data and serve as a clearinghouse for data integration and analysis;

Produce studies that address cost-drivers and duplication to eliminate barriers to health care and reduce costs;

Monitor current and future health care workforce needs and advise the Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce of significant changes in need or demand;

Participate in other state-wide health initiatives or programs affecting the entire state and nonrural areas of Georgia. The center shall cooperate with other health related state entities, including but not limited to the department, the Department of Public Health, the Department of Human Services, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities, and the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination and all other health related state boards, commissions, committees, councils, offices, and other entities on state-wide health initiatives or programs; and

In conjunction with the State Office of Rural Health, develop standards for education curriculum no later than January 1, 2019, which will be provided to leadership, including, but not limited to, hospital executive leadership, hospital board members, and hospital authority members of rural hospital organizations, as defined in Code Section 31-8-9.1, and to other rural health care facilities upon request. The curriculum shall include, at a minimum, legal, fiduciary, grant management, planning, and compliance training. The center shall approve education programs by any entity that the center determines to meet such standards.

The chief executive officer, the chief financial officer, every board member, and every hospital authority member, if operated by a hospital authority pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of this title, of a rural hospital organization as defined in Code Section 31-8-9.1, shall be required to complete an education program approved by the center pursuant to this paragraph no later than December 31, 2020, or within 12 months of initial hiring or appointment and every two years thereafter.

Any board member or hospital authority member who does not complete the education program as required pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be ineligible to continue serving as a board member or hospital authority member. The center may provide for notice and a grace period for board members and hospital authority members to come into compliance with such requirement. A vacancy created pursuant to this subparagraph on the board of a hospital authority shall be filled in the same manner as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 31-7-72 for the initial appointment of members of the hospital authority.

At the discretion of the department, any rural hospital organization that fails to ensure compliance by the chief executive officer, the chief financial officer, every board member, and every hospital authority member with the education requirements contained in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph shall be deemed:

Ineligible to receive contributions from the tax credit provided pursuant to Code Section 48-7-29.20;

Ineligible to participate in any grant programs offered by the state; and

Subject to a fine of $10,000.00 per violation.

The center is authorized to make application for and receive funds and grants as may be necessary to, and utilize and disburse such funds for such purposes and projects as will, carry out the purposes of the center.

The center is authorized to enter into contracts, agreements, and arrangements with colleges and universities to advance the work of the center. The center shall also be authorized to enter into contracts and agreements with the federal government; political subdivisions of this state; private firms, foundations, or institutions; or individuals for specific research on any aspects of rural health care as may be related to the purposes of this Code section. The center shall contract with a school of medicine in this state to provide clinical health care expertise to the center.

On or before October 1 of each year, the center shall file a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Health and Human Services Committee, the House Committee on Appropriations, the Senate Appropriations Committee, and the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination. The report shall include a summary of the activities of the center during the calendar year, including but not limited to the total number of hospital executives, hospital board members, and hospital authority members who received training from the center; the status of rural health care in the state; and recommendations, if any, for legislation as may be necessary to improve the programs and services offered by the center.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-2-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 3B/HB 769; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-4/HB 186; Ga. L. 2019, p. 224, § 2/SB 207; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 31/SB 52.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, deleted commas following “including” and “limited to” in the middle of the second sentences of paragraph (b)(11) and subsection (e); in paragraph (b)(11), in the second sentence, deleted “and” following “Department of Human Services” and inserted “and the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” in the middle; and, in the first sentence of subsection (e), deleted “and” preceding “the Senate Appropriations Committee”, and added “, and the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination” at the end. The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted “Georgia Board of Health Care Workforce” for “Georgia Board for Physician Workforce” in paragraph (b)(10). The third 2019 amendment, effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in subparagraph (b)(12)(B).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-4/HB 214, effective July 1, 2011, redesignated former Code Section 31-2-16 as present Code Section 31-2-11.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 132, § 8(c)/HB 769, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: “(c)(1) Section 3A of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2018, only if SB 357 or another Act creating the Health Coordination and Innovation Council is enacted by the General Assembly and becomes law in 2018, in which event Section 3B of this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2018.

“(2) If SB 357 or another Act creating the Health Coordination and Innovation Council does not become law in 2018, then Section 3B of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2018, and Section 3A of this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed on July 1, 2018.” SB 357 was passed by the General Assembly but was vetoed by the Governor on May 8, 2018, and did not become law.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”